Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.330

Salary reduction plan—Accounts and records.

The authority shall keep or cause to be kept full and adequate accounts and records of the assets, obligations, transactions, and affairs of a salary reduction plan created under RCW 41.05.300.

[ 2008 c 229 s 7; 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 229: See note following RCW 41.05.295.

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.